Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
265A]

COUNTY
HIGHWAYS AND SIDEWALKS

Section

265A-1 County authority

Note

City and county of Honolulu to take ownership of specified
road or parcel upon acceptance of funds. L 2016, c 194, §4.

Roads commission; private roads disputes; reports to
2018-2019 legislature (ceases to exist June 30, 2018). L 2016, c 194, §2.

Cross References

Use, repair, and maintenance of public roads in ownership
dispute, see §46-15.9.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next